Virginia statutes. Title 17.1. Courts of Record.
Chapter 8. Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission.

§ 17.1-800.
Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission created.

There is hereby created within the judicial branch as an agency of the Supreme Court of Virginia, the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission, hereinafter referred to in this chapter as the Commission.

History.

1994, 2nd Sp. Sess., cc. 1, 2, § 17-232; 1998, c. 872.

§ 17.1-801.
Purpose.

The General Assembly, to ensure the imposition of appropriate and just criminal penalties, and to make the most efficient use of correctional resources, especially for the effective incapacitation of violent criminal offenders, has determined that it is in the best interest of the Commonwealth to develop, implement, and revise discretionary sentencing guidelines. The purposes of the Commission established under this chapter are to assist the judiciary in the imposition of sentences by establishing a system of discretionary guidelines and to establish a discretionary sentencing guidelines system which emphasizes accountability of the offender and of the criminal justice system to the citizens of the Commonwealth.

The Commission shall develop discretionary sentencing guidelines to achieve the goals of certainty, consistency, and adequacy of punishment with due regard to the seriousness of the offense, the dangerousness of the offender, deterrence of individuals from committing criminal offenses and the use of alternative sanctions, where appropriate.

History.

1994, 2nd Sp. Sess., cc. 1, 2, § 17-233; 1998, c. 872.

§ 17.1-802.
Membership; terms; compensation and expenses.

The Commission shall be composed of 17 members as follows:

Six judges or justices, who may be judges of a circuit court who regularly hear criminal cases or judges or justices of the Supreme Court or the Court of Appeals, to be appointed by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court of Virginia;

One person who is not an active member of the judiciary, to be appointed as Chairman by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court of Virginia for a term of four years subject to confirmation by the General Assembly. The Chairman shall designate a vice-chairman from among the other members to serve a term commensurate with that of the Chairman;

The Chairman of the House Committee for Courts of Justice or his designee who shall be a member of the committee and two persons to be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Delegates;

The Chairman of the Senate Committee on the Judiciary or his designee who shall be a member of the committee and one person to be appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules;

Four persons to be appointed by the Governor, at least one of whom shall be a representative of a crime victims’ organization or a victim of crime as defined in subsection B of §

19.2-11.01

; and

The Attorney General of Virginia or his designee for a term commensurate with his term of office.All members shall be citizens of the Commonwealth.

Except for legislative members and gubernatorial appointments, appointments to the Commission made on and after January 1, 2001, shall be for terms of four years. Legislative members shall serve terms coincident with their terms of office. Appointments to the Commission made by the Governor on and after January 1, 2006, shall be for terms of four years. Members initially appointed to the Commission prior to January 1, 1998, may serve no more than three consecutive terms. Members initially appointed on and after January 1, 1998, shall not be eligible to serve more than two consecutive terms except for the Attorney General who shall serve by virtue of his office. Vacancies occurring other than by expiration of a term shall be filled for the unexpired term. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments. The remainder of any term to which a member is appointed to fill a vacancy or the service of an initial term of three years or less shall not constitute a term in determining the member’s eligibility for reappointment.

Legislative members of the Commission shall receive compensation as provided in § 30-19.12 and nonlegislative citizen members of the Commission shall receive compensation as provided in §

2.2-2813

and all members shall be reimbursed for all reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as provided in §§

2.2-2813

and

2.2-2825

. Funding for the costs of compensation and expenses of the members shall be provided by the Virginia Sentencing Commission.

History.

1994, 2nd Sp. Sess., cc. 1, 2, § 17-234; 1997, cc. 795, 883; 1998, cc. 226, 872; 2002, c. 79; 2004, c. 1000; 2005, c. 596.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2002, c. 79, cl. 2 provides: “That, except for the terms of gubernatorial appointees and the Attorney General, the term of any member currently serving on the Commission shall be extended and expire on December 31 in the year that the member’s term is scheduled to expire. The term of any current member appointed by the Governor shall expire on December 31, 2003. All subsequent terms of any member on the Commission, except the Attorney General, shall begin on January 1. For appointments made by the Governor to commence on January 1, 2004, one person shall be appointed to a term of two years, two persons for terms of three years, and one person for a term of four years.”

Acts 2004, c. 1000, cl. 5 provides: “That this act shall not be construed to affect existing appointments for which the terms have not expired. However, any new appointments or appointments to fill vacancies made after the effective date of this act shall be made in accordance with the provisions of this act.”

Acts 2005, c. 596, cl. 2 provides:
“That the provisions of this act shall not be construed to affect existing appointments for which the terms have not expired or for which there is no vacancy. However, any new appointments made after July 1, 2005, shall be made in accordance with the provisions of this act.”

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “Senate Committee on the Judiciary” for “Senate Committee for Courts of Justice” in subdivision A 4. March 10, 2021.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 79, in subsection B, added “Except for gubernatorial appointments” and substituted “on and after” for “on or after” in the first sentence, and added the second sentence.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 1000 substituted “17” for “seventeen” in subsection A; substituted “vice chairman” for “vice-chairman” in subdivision A 2; substituted “Senate Committee on Rules” for “Senate Committee on Privileges and Elections” in subdivision A 4; inserted “or his designee” in subdivision A 6; added the last paragraph in subsection A; added the last three sentences in subsection B; and rewrote subsection C.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 596 substituted “the Chairman of the House Committee for Courts of Justice or his designee who shall be a member of the committee and two persons” for “three persons” in subdivision A 3; substituted “the Chairman of the Senate Committee for Courts of Justice or his designee who shall be a member of the committee and one person” for “two persons” in subdivision A 4; in subsection B, inserted “legislative members and” in the first sentence, and added the second sentence; in subsection C, substituted “Legislative members of the Commission shall receive compensation as provided in § 30-19.12 and nonlegislative citizen members” for “members,” and inserted “all members” preceding “shall be reimbursed” and made a minor stylistic change.

§ 17.1-803.
Powers and duties.

The Commission shall:

Develop, maintain and modify as may be deemed necessary, a proposed system of statewide discretionary sentencing guidelines for use in all felony cases which will take into account historical data, when available, concerning time actually served for various felony offenses committed prior to January 1, 1995, and sentences imposed for various felony offenses committed on or after January 1, 1995, and such other factors as may be deemed relevant to sentencing.

Prepare, periodically update, and distribute sentencing worksheets for the use of sentencing courts which, when used, will produce a recommended sentencing range for a felony offense in accordance with the discretionary sentencing guidelines established pursuant to subdivision 1.

Prepare, periodically update, and distribute a form for the use of sentencing courts which will assist such courts in recording the reason or reasons for any sentence imposed in a felony case which is greater or less than the sentence recommended by the discretionary sentencing guidelines.

Prepare guidelines for sentencing courts to use in determining appropriate candidates for alternative sanctions which may include, but not be limited to (i) fines and day fines, (ii) boot camp incarceration, (iii) local correctional facility incarceration, (iv) diversion center incarceration, (v) detention center incarceration, (vi) home incarceration/electronic monitoring, (vii) day or evening reporting, (viii) probation supervision, (ix) intensive probation supervision, and (x) performance of community service.

Develop an offender risk assessment instrument for use in all felony cases, based on a study of Virginia felons, that will be predictive of the relative risk that a felon will become a threat to public safety.

Apply the risk assessment instrument to offenders convicted of any felony that is not specified in (i) subdivision 1, 2 or 3 of subsection A of §

17.1-805

or (ii) subsection C of §

17.1-805

under the discretionary sentencing guidelines, and shall determine, on the basis of such assessment and with due regard for public safety needs, the feasibility of achieving the goal of placing 25 percent of such offenders in one of the alternative sanctions listed in subdivision 4. If the Commission so determines that achieving the 25 percent or a higher percentage goal is feasible, it shall incorporate such goal into the discretionary sentencing guidelines, to become effective on January 1, 1996. If the Commission so determines that achieving the goal is not feasible, the Commission shall report that determination to the General Assembly, the Governor and the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court of Virginia on or before December 1, 1995, and shall make such recommendations as it deems appropriate.

Prepare, periodically update, and distribute a form for recording the reasons for, and outcomes of, revocation hearings conducted in circuit courts pursuant to §

19.2-306

.

Develop, maintain, and modify as may be deemed necessary a system of statewide discretionary sentencing guidelines for use in hearings conducted in circuit courts pursuant to §

19.2-306

in which the defendant is cited for violation of a condition or conditions of supervised probation imposed as a result of a felony conviction. Such guidelines shall take into account historical data for sentences imposed in such cases and such other factors as may be deemed relevant to sentencing.

Monitor sentencing practices in felony cases throughout the Commonwealth, including the use of the discretionary sentencing guidelines, and maintain a database containing the information obtained.

Monitor felony sentence lengths, crime trends, correctional facility population trends and correctional resources and make recommendations regarding projected correctional facilities capacity requirements and related correctional resource needs.

Study felony statutes in the context of judge-sentencing and jury-sentencing patterns as they evolve after January 1, 1995, and make recommendations for the revision of general criminal offense statutes to provide more specific offense definitions and more narrowly prescribed ranges of punishment.

Report upon its work and recommendations annually on or before December 1 to the General Assembly, the Governor and the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court of Virginia. Such report shall include any modifications to the discretionary sentencing guidelines adopted by the Commission pursuant to subdivision 1 and shall be accompanied by a statement of the reasons for those modifications.

Perform such other functions as may be otherwise required by law or as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

History.

1994, 2nd Sp. Sess., cc. 1, 2, § 17-235; 1998, c. 872; 2003, c. 139; 2022, cc. 569, 570.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2014, cc. 100 and 260, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. The proposed modifications to the discretionary sentencing guidelines for convictions related to the possession of child pornography in violation of subsections A and B of §

18.2-374.1:1

of the Code of Virginia adopted by the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission pursuant to subdivision 1 of §

17.1-803

of the Code of Virginia and contained in the Commission’s 2013 Annual Report pursuant to subdivision 10 of §

17.1-803

shall not become effective until July 1, 2016. The Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission shall review the discretionary sentencing guidelines recommendations for convictions related to the possession of child pornography in violation of subsections A and B of §

18.2-374.1:1

and complete its review by December 1, 2015. Any proposed modification to the discretionary sentencing guidelines for such convictions contained in the Commission’s 2015 Annual Report shall supersede the proposed modifications contained in the Commission’s 2013 Annual Report unless otherwise provided by law.”

Acts 2016, c. 394, cl. 1 provides: “That the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission shall calculate annually the recidivism rate of federal prisoners released by the U.S. Bureau of Prisons whose sentences were retroactively reduced pursuant to Amendments 782 and 788 of the U.S. Sentencing Commission’s Guidelines Manual for crimes committed in the Commonwealth. The Commission shall make a reasonable attempt to acquire the information necessary to complete the calculation from any available source, including any state or federal entity that has access to such information. The Commission shall report annually to the Chairmen of the House and Senate Committees for Courts of Justice (i) such recidivism rate no later than December 31 for the preceding 12-month period complete through the last day of October or (ii) if the Commission is unable to complete the calculation, any information regarding the recidivism rate of such prisoners as the Commission was able to acquire.”

Acts 2016, c. 394, cl. 2 provides “That the provisions of this act shall expire on January 1, 2018.”

Acts 2016, c. 398, cl. 1 provides: “The Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission (the Commission) under its powers and duties shall evaluate judge-sentencing and jury-sentencing patterns and practices in cases of manufacturing, selling, giving, distributing, or possessing with intent to manufacture, sell, give, or distribute heroin across the Commonwealth and recommend adjustments in the sentencing guidelines previously adopted by the Commission.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 139 twice substituted “25” for “twenty-five” in subdivision 6; and inserted the last sentence in subdivision 10.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 569 and 570 are identical, and added subdivisions 7 and 8 and redesignated accordingly.

§ 17.1-804.
Meetings; staff support.

Regular meetings of the Commission shall be held on a quarterly basis and at such other times as the Chairman may determine. Nine members of the Commission shall constitute a quorum. The Commission may hold public hearings.

The Commission may appoint a director and fix his duties and compensation. The Director may with prior approval of the Commission employ and fix the duties and compensation of such adequate staff as may be requisite to carry out the duties of the Commission. Other professional personnel, consultants and secretarial and clerical employees may be employed or contracted upon such terms and conditions as set forth by the Commission. The salaries, per diem and other expenses necessary to the functions of the Commission shall be payable from funds appropriated to the Commission. Adequate office space shall be provided by the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court.

All agencies of the Commonwealth, their staffs and employees shall provide the Commission with necessary information for the performance of its duties.

History.

1994, 2nd Sp. Sess., cc. 1, 2, § 17-236; 1998, c. 872.

§ 17.1-805.
Adoption of initial discretionary sentencing guideline midpoints.

The Commission shall adopt an initial set of discretionary felony sentencing guidelines which shall become effective on January 1, 1995. The initial recommended sentencing range for each felony offense shall be determined first, by computing the actual time-served distribution for similarly situated offenders, in terms of their conviction offense and prior criminal history, released from incarceration during the base period of calendar years 1988 through 1992, increased by 13.4 percent, and second, by eliminating from this range the upper and lower quartiles. The midpoint of each initial recommended sentencing range shall be the median time served for the middle two quartiles and subject to the following additional enhancements:

The midpoint of the initial recommended sentencing range for first degree murder, second degree murder, rape in violation of §

18.2-61

, forcible sodomy, object sexual penetration, and aggravated sexual battery shall be further increased by (i) 125 percent in cases in which the defendant has no previous conviction of a violent felony offense; (ii) 300 percent in cases in which the defendant has previously been convicted of a violent felony offense punishable by a maximum punishment of less than 40 years; or (iii) 500 percent in cases in which the defendant has previously been convicted of a violent felony offense punishable by a maximum punishment of 40 years or more, except that the recommended sentence for a defendant convicted of first degree murder who has previously been convicted of a violent felony offense punishable by a maximum term of imprisonment of 40 years or more shall be imprisonment for life;

The midpoint of the initial recommended sentencing range for voluntary manslaughter, robbery, aggravated malicious wounding, malicious wounding, and any burglary of a dwelling house or statutory burglary of a dwelling house or any burglary committed while armed with a deadly weapon or any statutory burglary committed while armed with a deadly weapon shall be further increased by (i) 100 percent in cases in which the defendant has no previous conviction of a violent felony offense, (ii) 300 percent in cases in which the defendant has previously been convicted of a violent felony offense punishable by a maximum term of imprisonment of less than 40 years, or (iii) 500 percent in cases in which the defendant has previously been convicted of a violent felony offense punishable by a maximum term of imprisonment of 40 years or more;

The midpoint of the initial recommended sentencing range for manufacturing, selling, giving, or distributing, or possessing with the intent to manufacture, sell, give, or distribute a Schedule I or II controlled substance, shall be increased by (i) 200 percent in cases in which the defendant has previously been convicted of a violent felony offense punishable by a maximum punishment of less than 40 years or (ii) 400 percent in cases in which the defendant has previously been convicted of a violent felony offense punishable by a maximum term of imprisonment of 40 years or more; and

The midpoint of the initial recommended sentencing range for felony offenses not specified in subdivision 1, 2, or 3 shall be increased by 100 percent in cases in which the defendant has previously been convicted of a violent felony offense punishable by a maximum punishment of less than 40 years and by 300 percent in cases in which the defendant has previously been convicted of a violent felony offense punishable by a maximum term of imprisonment of 40 years or more.

For purposes of this chapter, previous convictions shall include prior adult convictions and juvenile convictions and adjudications of delinquency based on an offense which would have been at the time of conviction a felony if committed by an adult under the laws of any state, the District of Columbia, or the United States or its territories.

For purposes of this chapter, violent felony offenses shall include any felony violation of § 16.1-253.2; solicitation to commit murder under §

18.2-29

; any violation of §

18.2-31

,

18.2-32

,

18.2-32

.1,

18.2-32.2

,

18.2-33

, or

18.2-35

; any violation of subsection B of §

18.2-36.1

; any violation of §

18.2-40

or

18.2-41

; any violation of clause (c)(i) or (ii) of subsection B of §

18.2-46.3

; any violation of §

18.2-46.5

,

18.2-46.6

, or

18.2-46.7

; any Class 5 felony violation of §

18.2-47

; any felony violation of §

18.2-48

,

18.2-48.1

, or

18.2-49

; any violation of §

18.2-51

,

18.2-51.1

,

18.2-51

.2,

18.2-51.3

,

18.2-51.4

,

18.2-51.6

,

18.2-52

,

18.2-52

.1,

18.2-53

,

18.2-53

.1,

18.2-54.1

,

18.2-54.2

, or

18.2-55

; any violation of subsection B of §

18.2-57

; any felony violation of §

18.2-57.2

; any violation of §

18.2-58

or

18.2-58.1

; any felony violation of §

18.2-60.1

,

18.2-60.3

, or

18.2-60.4

; any violation of §

18.2-61

,

18.2-64.1

,

18.2-67.1

,

18.2-67.2

, former §

18.2-67.2

:1,

18.2-67.3

,

18.2-67.5

, or

18.2-67.5

:1 involving a third conviction of either sexual battery in violation of §

18.2-67.4

or attempted sexual battery in violation of subsection C of § 18.2-67.5; any Class 4 felony violation of §

18.2-63

; any violation of subsection A of §

18.2-67.4:1

; any violation of subsection A of §

18.2-77

; any Class 3 felony violation of §

18.2-79

; any Class 3 felony violation of §

18.2-80

; any violation of §

18.2-85

,

18.2-89

,

18.2-90

,

18.2-91

,

18.2-92

, or

18.2-93

; any felony violation of §

18.2-152.7

; any Class 4 felony violation of §

18.2-153

; any Class 4 felony violation of §

18.2-154

; any Class 4 felony violation of §

18.2-155

; any felony violation of §

18.2-162

; any violation of §

18.2-279

involving an occupied dwelling; any felony violation of subsection A or B of §

18.2-280

; any violation of §

18.2-281

; any felony violation of subsection A of §

18.2-282

; any felony violation of §

18.2-282

.1; any violation of §

18.2-286.1

,

18.2-287.2

,

18.2-289

, or

18.2-290

; any violation of subsection A of §

18.2-300

; any felony violation of subsection C of §

18.2-308.1

or §

18.2-308.2

; any violation of §

18.2-308.2:1

or subsection M or N of §

18.2-308.2

:2; any violation of §

18.2-308.3

or

18.2-312

; any former felony violation of §

18.2-346

; any felony violation of §

18.2-346

.01,

18.2-348

, or

18.2-349

; any violation of §

18.2-355

,

18.2-356

,

18.2-35

7, or

18.2-357.1

; any violation of former §

18.2-358

; any violation of subsection B of §

18.2-361

; any violation of subsection B of §

18.2-366

; any violation of §

18.2-368

,

18.2-370

, or

18.2-370

.1; any violation of subsection A of §

18.2-371.1

; any felony violation of §

18.2-369

resulting in serious bodily injury or disease; any violation of §

18.2-374.1

; any felony violation of §

18.2-374.1:1

; any violation of §

18.2-374.3

or

18.2-374.4

; any second or subsequent offense under §§

18.2-379

and

18.2-381

; any felony violation of §

18.2-405

or

18.2-406

; any violation of §

18.2-408

,

18.2-413

,

18.2-41

4,

18.2-423

,

18.2-423.01

,

18.2-423

.1,

18.2-423.2

, or

18.2-433.2

; any felony violation of §

18.2-460

,

18.2-474.1

, or

18.2-477.1

; any violation of §

18.2-477

,

18.2-478

,

18.2-480

,

18.2-48

1, or

18.2-485

; any violation of §

37.2-917

; any violation of §

52-48

; any violation of §

53.1-203

; any conspiracy or attempt to commit any offense specified in this subsection, or any substantially similar offense under the laws of any state, the District of Columbia, or the United States or its territories.

History.

1994, 2nd Sp. Sess., cc. 1, 2, § 17-237; 1995, c. 482; 1998, cc. 277, 872; 1999, c. 349; 2004, cc. 459, 866; 2005, c. 631; 2011, c. 282; 2013, cc. 424, 647; 2015, cc. 690, 691; 2019, c. 617; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 188.

Cross references.

As to revocation and suspension of registration of tow truck driver, see §

46.2-117

.

As to mandatory background screenings for TNC partners to provide updated information to transportation network companies, see §

46.2-2099.49

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2015, cc. 690 and 691, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 2 of the Acts of Assembly of 2014, Special Session I, requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Acts 2019, c. 617, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 2 of the Acts of Assembly of 2018, Special Session I, requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, substituted “(c) (i)” for “(c)(i)” in subsection C.

The 1999 amendment,

in subsection C, substituted “18.2-32.1,

18.2-33

, or §

18.2-35

; any violation of subsection B of §

18.2-36.1

; any violation of §

18.2-40

” for “18.2-33,

18.2-35

,

18.2-40

”; substituted “18.2-51.3,

18.2-51.4

,

18.2-52

,

18.2-52.1

” for “18.2-52”; deleted “or” following “18.2-55”; substituted “18.2-67.5, or §

18.2-67.5:1

involving a third conviction of either sexual battery in violation of §

18.2-67.4

or attempted sexual battery in violation of subsection C of §

18.2-67.5

” for “or §

18.2-67.5

”; and substituted “§

18.2-153

; any Class 4 felony violation of §

18.2-154

; any Class 4 felony violation of” for “§§

18.2-153

,

18.2-154

or.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 459 substituted “40” for “forty” throughout the section and inserted “former” preceding “§

18.2-358

” in subsection C.

The 2004 amendment by c. 866 substituted “40” for “forty” throughout the section; inserted “solicitation to commit murder under §

18.2-29

” and “18.2-46.5,

18.2-46.6

, or §

18.2-46.7

” in subsection C; and made a related change.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 631 inserted “former §” preceding “18.2-67.2:1” in subsection C; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 282 substituted “any felony violation of subsection C of §

18.2-308.1

or

18.2-308.2

” for “any felony violation of §§

18.2-308.1

and

18.2-308.2

” in subsection C.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 424 and 647 are nearly identical, and rewrote subsection C.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 690 and 691 are identical, and inserted “any violation of §

18.2-357.1

” in subsection C and made a stylistic change.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 617, in subsection C, substituted “any felony violation of §

18.2-346

,

18.2-348

, or

18.2-349

; any violation of §

18.2-355

,

18.2-356

,

18.2-357

, or

18.2-357.1

;” for “; any violation of subdivision (2) or (3) of §

18.2-355

; any violation of §

18.2-357.1

;”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 188, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “any former felony violation of §

18.2-346

; any former felony violation of §

18.2-346.01

” for “any former felony violation of §

18.2-346

” in subsection C.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

5B M.J. Criminal Procedure, § 81; 19 M.J. Warrants, § 6; 20 M.J. Weapons, § 4.1.

§ 17.1-805.1.
(Effective July 1, 2023) Discretionary sentencing guideline midpoints for certain defendants.

The Commission shall adopt discretionary felony sentencing guidelines that may increase the midpoint of the recommended sentencing range based on the defendant’s record of convictions for violent felony offenses, as defined in subsection C of §

17.1-805

.

For guidelines that become effective on or after July 1, 2022, the Commission may increase the midpoint of the recommended sentencing range for such defendants as set forth in subsection A of §

17.1-805

or the Commission may recommend increases in the midpoint to the degree indicated by historical data for felony offenses sentenced in the Commonwealth. Any recommendations adopted by the Commission to modify the sentencing guidelines midpoints shall be contained in the annual report required under §

17.1-803

and shall become effective in accordance with §

17.1-806

.

History.

2022, cc. 723, 783.

Editor's note.

Acts
2022, cc. 723 and
783, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to
§ 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Acts
2022, cc. 723 and
783, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2023.”

§ 17.1-806.
Sentencing guidelines modifications; effective date.

After adoption of the initial guidelines, any modification to the discretionary sentencing guidelines adopted by the Commission shall be contained in the annual report required under §

17.1-803

and shall, unless otherwise provided by law, become effective on the next following July 1.

History.

1994, 2nd Sp. Sess., cc. 1, 2, § 17-238; 1998, c. 872.